District of Columbia statutes.
6-1451.11

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(b)

The Mayor may issue proposed rules to adopt another rating system, in whole or in part. Proposed rules to adopt another rating system shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed disapproved.

(c)

Notwithstanding the requirements of § 2-552(c), where the Mayor chooses to adopt a LEED or Green Communities standard as the District’s standard under this chapter, DDOE may do so by incorporating the LEED or Green Communities standard by reference in a Notice of Intent to take rulemaking action. When incorporating the LEED or Green Communities standard by reference, the notice shall include a specific indication of how and where a paper or electronic copy of such document may be inspected or obtained. Any amendments, supplements, or future editions to the LEED or Green Communities Standard shall be deemed to be included in the District’s standard; provided, that DDOE shall annually issue a Notice of Intent to adopt any amendments, supplements, or future editions to the LEED or Green Communities, in whole, or in part, or announce an intent to adopt a different standard.

Mar. 8, 2007, D.C. Law 16-234, § 12, 54 DCR 377
June 5, 2012, D.C. Law 19-139, § 2(j), 59 DCR 2555
Delegation of Authority—Green Building Act of 2006, see Mayor’s Order 2010-1, January 15, 2010 ( 57 DCR 641).
“(b) The Mayor may issue proposed rules to adopt future amendments, supplements, and editions of the LEED rating system, or any other rating system, in whole or in part. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.”
“(a) Within 180 days of March 8, 2007, the Mayor shall promulgate rules to implement this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.
D.C. Law 19-139 rewrote the section, which formerly read:
This section is referenced in § 6-1451.01.